Maine, session 132, LD1029.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4308, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Housing assistance not to reduce assistance for other basic necessities.
Housing assistance provided under this chapter may not reduce the maximum assistance
level for other basic necessities for which a person or household is eligible to ensure that
the person's or household's basic necessities are adequately met. The total maximum
assistance level for a person or household must sufficiently account for housing assistance
while providing adequate eligibility for other basic necessities.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4309, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 515, §3, is amended to
read:
5. Presumptive eligibility. The overseer in a municipality shall presume eligibility
to receive general assistance of a person who is provided shelter in an emergency shelter
for the homeless located in that municipality. After 30 180 days, that person's eligibility
must be redetermined. When presumptive eligibility is determined under this subsection,
no other municipality may be determined to be the municipality of responsibility during
that 30-day 180-day period.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4311, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. SSSS, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The department shall reimburse each municipality and each Indian tribe 70% 90% of the
direct costs incurred by that municipality or tribe on or after July 1, 2015 for the general
assistance program granted by that municipality or tribe. The department shall reimburse
each municipality and each Indian tribe 100% of the direct costs incurred by that
municipality or tribe for providing emergency shelter for the homeless. For the purposes
of this subsection, "Indian tribe" has the same meaning as in section 411, subsection 8‑A.